Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 36 Emergency Medical Services

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Admissibility of evidence of polygraph test results, or offer or refusal to take test, in action for malicious prosecution, 10 ALR5th 680.

Liability for negligence of ambulance attendants, emergency medical technicians and the like, rendering emergency medical care outside hospital, 16 ALR5th 605.